Massachusetts, session 194th, H3171.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of chapter 64A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Any sale of fuel, including but not limited to unleaded gasoline and diesel fuel, by a
distributor to the commonwealth, any state agency or any municipality or its agencies shall be
exempt from the tax per gallon contained in this chapter.
of 1